Hawaii statutes.
[§266-4.5 Disposition of public land;
reservation of right of way.] Whenever any disposition of public land is
made by the department of transportation, under its powers relating to public
lands under its jurisdiction, to any persons, organizations, associations,
corporations or clubs for recreational or social purposes, such leases,
licenses, permits or right-of-entry, or any extensions thereof, covering the
disposition of public lands shall contain provisions reserving adequate public
right of way or public access to adjacent public areas over and across the
public land disposed. [L 1970, c 101, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next